src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in UNDEFINED language are actions.


LEXICON IVstem 
kuyo IVsuf ; ! pseudo orthographic form of Harrington's "bæ`ku·´yω´" ye-sit
         ! https://www.journals.uchicago.edu/doi/10.1086/463919

LEXICON TVstem
dey TVsuf ; ! pseudo orthographic form of Harrington's "`dey`" he-wanted
         ! https://www.journals.uchicago.edu/doi/10.1086/463919


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
